Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 14 Equity Practice

9-14-1.
Statutory proceedings following course of equity.

Subject to applicable procedural rules, all petitions for the enforcement of mechanics’ liens, petitions for divorce, and statutory proceedings so prescribed by statute, shall follow the course of equity so far as it is applicable.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 304; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-14-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 27.

9-14-2 — 9-14-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 305 — 309, 318, 319; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, §§ 2 — 6, 15, 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, §§ 2 — 6, 15, 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, §§ 2 — 6, 15, 16; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 28, effective January 10, 1966.

9-14-9 — 9-14-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 317; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 14; G.L. 1956, §§

9-14-9

, 9-14-10; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 8); Repealed by P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 5. For present law, see Rule 13 of the Rules of Procedure for Domestic Relations.

9-14-11 — 9-14-24.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 310-315, 320, 322-324, 327, 354; P.L. 1907, ch. 1459, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, §§ 7-12, 17, 19-21, 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 291, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, §§ 7-12, 17, 19-21, 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 341, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, §§ 7-12, 17, 19-21, 24, 27, 28; P.L. 1951, ch. 2745, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 28, effective January 10, 1966.

9-14-25.
Expenses and counsel fees paid out of decedent’s or trust estate.

In any civil action or other proceeding wherein construction of a will or trust deed or any part thereof is asked, there may be allowed to each of the parties defendant brought in by the action or other proceeding, applying therefor, such reasonable sum for expenses and on account of counsel fees as the court in which the case is pending shall deem proper; the allowance shall be taxed as costs in the cause and be paid out of the estate or fund in the hands of the complainant concerning which estate or fund the construction is asked.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 325; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

9-14-25

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 27.

9-14-26.
Master’s conveyance of property.

If a judgment directs a party to execute a conveyance of land or to deliver deeds or other documents or to perform any other specified acts and the party fails to comply within the time specified, the court may direct the act to be done at the cost of the disobedient party by a master in chancery or some other person appointed by the court, and the act when so done has like effect as if done by the party.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 326; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

9-14-26

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 27.

9-14-27.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 39 P.L. 1929, ch. 1338, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 25; P.L. 1940, ch. 934, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-14-27

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 28, effective January 10, 1966.

9-14-28.
Court rule or order varying forms of process or mode of proceeding.

The superior court may, by general rule or by special order, vary the forms of process, mode of proceeding, or of decree, heretofore in use, in such manner as may be necessary to carry into effect the provisions of any statute of this state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 321; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 528, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

9-14-28

.